Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB305.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 531(b)(11) of Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 531(B)(11) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (I) OF TITLE 62 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 531. Debarment or suspension.* * *(b) Causes for debarment or suspension.--The causes for debarment or suspension include:* * *(11) Unsatisfactory performance, WHICH OCCURRED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH OR ANY OTHER STATE, including, but not limited <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 to, any of the following:* * *(viii) A demonstrated history of an action specified under subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), (vi) or (vii) for a government agency contract or subcontract in any other state or for any other public owner.* * *(I) FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH TERMS OF A [COMMONWEALTH AGENCY] CONTRACT OR SUBCONTRACT[,] ENTERED INTO WITH AN AGENCY OR DEPARTMENT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, WITH A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY OR WITH AN AGENCY OR DEPARTMENT OF ANY OTHER STATE, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO: WILLFUL FAILURE TO PERFORM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF ONE OR MORE CONTRACTS, A HISTORY OF FAILURE TO PERFORM OR UNSATISFACTORY PERFORMANCE OF ONE OR MORE CONTRACTS.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0305PN0754 - 2 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617